Maine, session 132, LD1727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
COMMUNICATIONS WITH CONSUMERS VIA ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
§1500-Y. Required disclosure of use of artificial intelligence chatbot to engage in trade
and commerce
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Artificial intelligence chatbot" means a software application, web interface or
computer program that simulates human conversation and interaction through textual
or aural communications.
B. "Trade" and "commerce" have the same meaning as in Title 5, section 206,
subsection 3.
2. Required disclosure of use of artificial intelligence chatbot to engage in trade
and commerce. A person may not use an artificial intelligence chatbot or any other
computer technology to engage in trade and commerce with a consumer in a manner that
may mislead or deceive a reasonable consumer into believing that the consumer is engaging
with a human being unless the consumer is notified in a clear and conspicuous manner that
the consumer is not engaging with a human being.
3. Violation. A violation of subsection 2 is a violation of the Maine Unfair Trade
Practices Act.
Page 1 - 132LR2313(03)